Utah statutes.
53-3-408.   Qualifications for commercial driver instruction permit.

(1)  The division may issue a CDIP to a person who:

(a)  holds a valid license;

(b)  has at least one year of driving experience; and

(c)  has passed the vision and knowledge test for the class of license for which he is applying.

(2)  A CDIP may be:

(a)  issued only for a period not to exceed six months; and

(b)  renewed or issued again only once within a two-year period.

(3)  The holder of a CDIP may drive a commercial motor vehicle on a highway only when accompanied by a person who:

(a) (i)  holds a CDL valid for the type of commercial motor vehicle driven; or

(ii)  is certified by the division to administer driver licensing examinations to CDL applicants; and

(b)  occupies a seat beside the individual for the purpose of:

(i)  giving the driver instruction regarding the driving of the commercial motor vehicle; or

(ii)  administering a driver licensing examination to a CDL applicant.

(4)  A CDL or CDIP may not be issued to a person:

(a)  subject to disqualification from driving a commercial motor vehicle; or

(b)  whose license is suspended, revoked, or canceled in any state.

(5)  A CDL or CDIP may not be issued to a person until the person has surrendered all license certificates the person holds to the division for cancellation.

